test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-Clex_kaamuv_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# This yaml is for contraction stems -uv (in North Saami these are 3-syllabic; as you see in Aanaar Saami there are still some forms left from the former 3-syllabic system)

  Noun - kaamuv: # ok, MLO; cons gradation m:mm
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Nom: [kaamâ, kaamuv]
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Gen: kammuu
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Acc: kammuu
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Ill: kammui
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Loc: kammust
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Com: kammuin
    kaamuv+N+Sg+Abe: kammuuttáá
    kaamuv+N+Ess: [kamuvin, kammun]
    kaamuv+N+Par: [kamuvid, kammud]
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Nom: kammuuh
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Gen: kammui
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Acc: kammuid
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Ill: kammuid
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Loc: kammuin
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Com: [kammuiguin, kammuigijn]
    kaamuv+N+Pl+Abe: kammuittáá

  Noun - peenuv: # ok, MLO; cons gradation n:nn
    peenuv+N+Sg+Nom: peenuv
    peenuv+N+Sg+Gen: pennuu
    peenuv+N+Sg+Acc: pennuu
    peenuv+N+Sg+Ill: pennui
    peenuv+N+Sg+Loc: pennust # pennâgist a well-known rare variant; must be accepted
    peenuv+N+Sg+Com: pennuin
    peenuv+N+Sg+Abe: pennuuttáá
    peenuv+N+Ess: [penuvin, pennun]
    peenuv+N+Par: [penuvid, pennud]
    peenuv+N+Pl+Nom: pennuuh
    peenuv+N+Pl+Gen: pennui
    peenuv+N+Pl+Acc: pennuid
    peenuv+N+Pl+Ill: pennuid
    peenuv+N+Pl+Loc: pennuin
    peenuv+N+Pl+Com: [pennuiguin, pennuigijn]
    peenuv+N+Pl+Abe: pennuittáá

  Noun - maaijuv: # 
    maaijuv+N+Sg+Nom: maaijuv
    maaijuv+N+Sg+Gen: maijuu 
    maaijuv+N+Sg+Acc: maijuu
    maaijuv+N+Sg+Ill: maijui
    maaijuv+N+Sg+Loc: maijust
    maaijuv+N+Sg+Com: maijuin
    maaijuv+N+Sg+Abe: maijuuttáá
    maaijuv+N+Ess: [maijuvin, maijun]
    maaijuv+N+Par: [maijuvid, maijud]
    maaijuv+N+Pl+Nom: maijuuh
    maaijuv+N+Pl+Gen: maijui
    maaijuv+N+Pl+Acc: maijuid
    maaijuv+N+Pl+Ill: maijuid 
    maaijuv+N+Pl+Loc: maijuin
    maaijuv+N+Pl+Com: [maijuiguin, maijuigijn]
    maaijuv+N+Pl+Abe: maijuittáá
